src/nounLexcErz.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8-unix -*- 
Multichar_Symbols

! tags
+ZeroSuf
!Possessives
+Poss1Sg !
+Poss1Sg/Н !
+Poss1Sg/м !
+Poss2Sg !
+Poss3Sg !
+Poss1Pl !
+Poss2Pl !
+Poss3Pl !
+Poss3 ! this is dative marker "О1нстэнь"

+1Sg !
+1SgM !
+1SgN !
+2Sg !
+3Sg !
+1Pl !
+2Pl !
+3Pl !
+1 !
+2 !
+20
+Abe !
+Abl !
+Acronym !
+Ad-A !
+Adj !
+Adv_CEK !
+Adv_NEK !
+Adv !
+Adverbial !
+Allegro ! лома for ломань
+Anim !
!+Animate ! >> +Anim
+Anthroponym !
+AntiqLit ! antiquitated, used in modern Lit
+Artifact
+Assoc ! Associative
+Attr
+Capitalizing !
+CEK
+Clan !
+Clt !Clitic
+CltButi !
+CltGak !
+ClitGak ! KLOSS
+Cnt
+Com ! Comitative
+Common ! >> +NCom
+Comp !
+Cond !
+Conj !
+Conjunction !
+Count ! > +Cnt
!CASE!
+Cx
+IndefNomSg
+IndefNomPl
+GenIndef
+Abl+Indef
+Lat+Indef
+Loc+Indef
+Prol+Indef

+NomDefSg
+GenDefSg
+DatDefSg
+DefSg

+PlDefPlNom
+PlDefPl

+Dat !
+Deict ! Deictic
+Dem ! Demonstrative
+Des !
+Deverbal !
+Dial !
+DimK !
+DimKA !
+DimKINE !
+DimKE !
+DimKO !
+DimNE !
+DimNYKA !
+Dog
+Ela !
+Erz !Erzya or Erzya-like
+Familiar !
+First !
+FirstF !
+FirstM !
+ForeignNew
+ForeignOld
+Gen !
+Ger ! Gerund ZY
+Homestead
+Ideophone !
+Ill !
+Imp !
+Inanim !
!+Inanimate ! > +Inanim
+Ind !
+Indef !
+Indet !
+Ine !
+Interj ! Interjection
+Iter ! Iterative (number)
+Kin
+KLoss !
+Last !
+LastF !
+LastM !
+Lat
+Loc !
+LV !+VowX !alternates with +NoVowX
+Manner !
+Mdf !Moksha
+Mod ! Modal
+N1 ! noun type 1
+N1S ! noun type 1S
+N2 ! noun type 2
+N2I
+N2U
+N3 ! noun type 3
+NCom ! common noun
+NConsStem !
+NCnt !
+Noncount ! >> +NCnt
+NVowStem !
+NMixedStem !
+NPrp ! proper noun
+Neg !
+NoClitic !
+NoLV !+NoVowX !No linking with suffix.
+NoLVStem ! used with +N2I and +N2U "no stem vowel"
+LVStem ! used with +N2I and +N2U "stem vowel"
+Nom !
+NomGen ! both nominative and genitive usage
+NonNomSg !
+NoNum ! No number
+NoPossPx !
+NoPredx !
+Noun !
+Noun2 !
+Obj !
+OldOrth !
+Opt !
+Orth_dial
+Orth_hyphen
+Orth_Kozl
+Orth_familiar
+Orth_folksy
+OrthMorph
+OrthOld
+OrthPhon
+Orth_ru
+Orth_vHarm ! unexpected vowel harmony: Тенгушень
+Particle !>> +Prt
+PatronymF !
+PatronymM !
+PerifMod ! Periferal modifier
+Pl !
+Poss !
+Postp !
+Pred !
+Pres !
+PretII !
+Prol !
+Pron !
+Pronoun ! This should be convertedt to "+Pron"
+Proper ! >> +NPrp
+Prt !Particle
+Ptc !Participle
+ZPrt !
+Q !
+Quant ! >> +Q
+Sandhi ! set in compound words 
+Settlement !
+Sg !
+Spat4
+Spatial !
+State ! Adverb expressing State "кепе, озадо"
+Subj !
+SubS ! Substandard
+SurnameM
+Temporal !Case name
+Temp !Property of Durativity attributed to noun, e.g. "rain", "day"
+Toponym !
+Transl !
+Verb
+V2Adj !
+V2Nma !Deverbal Noun in "mo" and "ma"
+VConsStem !
+VVowStem !
+VTStem !
+Vocat !
+VoicingCons !
+Wife !

!!Derivations
+Deriv !
+Der/кс
+Der/це +Der/се ! Determinate marker
+SOD !speaker-oriented deictic marker

 !
 ! Ending requiring linking vowel
 !Ending not requiring linking vowel
+OptVow ! Optional with type 2 nominals




! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
У2
И2

!Nominal stem vowels
!карИ3, ямУ3, верьгизЫ3
У3
И3
Ы3

! Nominal stem vowel following vowel, word finally realized as "й"
!И4

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
У4


! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2
Ы2

! derivational suffix protovowel 
О1

! clitic proto consonant
Г1
!Prolative
Г2


! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
V1

!
!loss and no loss of U2
VLoss


!
@P.BUTI.ON@
@R.BUTI.ON@
@D.BUTI.ON@
@C.BUTI@

@P.KLOSS.ON@
@R.KLOSS.ON@
@C.KLOSS@

@P.LV.ON@
@P.LV.OFF@
@D.LV.ON@
@C.LV@

@P.NUM.SG@
@P.NUM.PL@
@D.NUM.SG@
@D.NUM.PL@
@C.NUM@




!!!
!
LEXICON Spatials_4cx
+Spat4+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:^це Nouns3 ;
+Spat4+Loc+Der/се:^се Nouns3 ;
+Spat4+Der/кс:^кс Nouns1S ;

+Spat4+Lat+Indef:^О1в Clitics ;

+Spat4+Loc+Indef:^О1 Nouns3-1 ; 
+Spat4+Prol+Indef:^Г2а Nouns3-1 ;
+Spat4+Abl+Indef:^дО1 Nouns3-1 ;

+Spat4+Abl:^дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Spat4+Loc:^О1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ; 
+Spat4+Prol:^Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;


LEXICON Mezty
+Assoc+Pl+Nom:^мезть Clitics ;
+Assoc+Dat:^мезнень Clitics ;
+Assoc+Gen:^мезень Clitics ;
+Assoc+Abl:^мезде Clitics ;
+Assoc+Abe:^мезевтеме Clitics ;
!+Assoc:^мезть Clitics
!+Assoc:^мезть Clitics

!!2011-03-21 THIS FAR


LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension
!!!!Secondary declension
!!Indefinite declension
+Abe+Indef:^втО1мО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Abl+Indef:^дО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Comp+Indef:^О1шка Nouns3-1 ;
+Ela+Indef:^стО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Ine+Indef:^сО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Prol+Indef:^Г2а Nouns3-1 ;
+Transl+Indef:^О1кс Nouns1S-1 ;

!!Definite Plural declension
+Pl.DefPl+Abe:^тне^втеме Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abl:^тне^де Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Comp:^тне^шка Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ela:^тне^стэ Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ine:^тне^сэ Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Prol:^тне^ва Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Transl:^тне^кс Nouns1S-1 ;

!!
+Gen+OrthOld+SOD:^О1нсе Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+OrthMorph+SOD:^О1ньсе Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+OrthPhon+SOD:^О1нце Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthMorph+DefSg+SOD:^О1нт^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg+SOD:^О1нУ4^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg+SOD:^О1тУ4^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg+SOD:^О1нзО1^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl+SOD:^О1нО1к^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl+SOD:^О1нк^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl+SOD:^О1ст^се Nouns3-1 ;


+Abe:^втО1мО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Abl:^дО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Comp:^О1шка Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ela:^стО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ine:^сО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Prol:^Г2а Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Transl:^О1кс Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss

!!Possessive declension
+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Nouns1-1 ;



LEXICON Nouns1 
 Nouns1-1 ;
+N1: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;



LEXICON Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON Nouns1S 
 Nouns1S-1 ;
+N1S: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns1S-1 
+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1S+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_ReqVow ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow ;
 Mezty ;



LEXICON Nouns2I 
 Nouns2I-1 ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
+N2I+NoLVStem: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-1
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-y
 Nouns2I-y-1 ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:ь Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-y-1
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:ь Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:ь Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-j 
 Nouns2I-j-1 ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:й Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-j-1 
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:й Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:й Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2U 
 Nouns2U-1 ;
+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
+N2U+NoLVStem: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns2U-1
+N2U+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:о Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2U+Abs+LVStem:о Tenses-Abs ;
+N2U+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2U+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns3 
 Nouns3-1 ;
+N3: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns3-1
+N3+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N3+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N3: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N3: Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON Root
гвардейской+Adj+ForeignOld:гвардейской Nouns1 ;
каштанув+Adj:каштанув Nouns1 ;
кичкере_сельме+Adj:кичкере_сельм Nouns2I ;
орькс+Adj:орькс Nouns1S ;
полеводческой+Adj+ForeignOld:полеводческой Nouns1 ;
рисьмесельме+Adj:рисьмесельм Nouns2I ;
фронтовой+Adj:фронтовой Nouns1 ;
акселерация+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:акселерация Nouns3 ;
аксорявкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:аксорявкс Nouns1S ;
атятеште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:атятешт Nouns2I-y ;
барин+NCom:барин Nouns1 ;
барлакланго+NCom+Composite+Inanim+Cnt:барлакланг Nouns2U ;
Боляевич+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+PatronymM:Боляевич Nouns1S ;
ботвения+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ботвения Nouns3 ;
вармапеке+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:вармапек Nouns2I ;
ваце+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:вац Nouns2I-y ;
верьтомбавкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:верьтомбавкс Nouns1S ;
Воронкина+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Воронкина Nouns3 ;
гермошлём+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:гермошлём Nouns1 ;
грецяпанго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:грецяпанг Nouns2U ;
гулькаваце+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:гулькавац Nouns2I-y ;
Евсеич+NPrp+Orth_familiar+Anim+Cnt+PatronymM:Евсеич Nouns1S ;
Еряшева+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Еряшева Nouns3 ;
ие+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:и Nouns2I-j ;
илык+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:илык Nouns1 ;
инекече+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:инекеч Nouns2I ;
истямо+Pron+Dem:истям Nouns2U ;
каллукш+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:каллукш Nouns1S ;
кальпеште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кальпешт Nouns2I-y ;
Кановна+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+PatronymF:Кановна Nouns3 ;
кардазпотмо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кардазпотм Nouns2U ;
каштыкеле+Spatial:каштыкель Spatials_4cx ;
келеме+NCom+Anim+Cnt:келем Nouns2I ;
кенде+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кенд Nouns2I-y ;
кенерькундо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кенерькунд Nouns2U ;
килькшавкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:килькшавкс Nouns1S ;
комаське+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:комаське Nouns3 ;
комбикорм+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:комбикорм Nouns1 ;
кошельпеке+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кошельпек Nouns2I ;
кудоундокс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кудоундокс Nouns1S ;
кумажаланго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кумажаланг Nouns2U ;
кшниваце+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кшнивац Nouns2I-y ;
латкопуло+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:латкопуло Nouns3 ;
лисьмаланго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:лисьмаланг Nouns2U ;
Любавцев+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameM:Любавцев Nouns1 ;
мельке+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:мельк Nouns2I ;
Миловславская+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Миловславская Nouns3 ;
мирде+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:мирд Nouns2I-y ;
монах+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:монах Nouns1S ;
моцькапарго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:моцькапарг Nouns2U ;
нарде+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:нард Nouns2I-y ;
окульця+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:окульця Nouns3 ;
окуляр+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:окуляр Nouns1 ;
панго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:панг Nouns2U ;
пангопильге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пангопильг Nouns2I ;
пеште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пешт Nouns2I-y ;
пизельундо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пизельунд Nouns2U ;
пиземесукс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пиземесукс Nouns1S ;
пировамо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пировамо Nouns3 ;
писте+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пист Nouns2I-y ;
письпеке+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:письпек Nouns2I ;
почитатель+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:почитатель Nouns1 ;
равенства+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:равенства Nouns3 ;
раське+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:раськ Nouns2I ;
рашко+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:рашк Nouns2U ;
рогапеште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:рогапешт Nouns2I-y ;
селеикс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:селеикс Nouns1S ;
сизевть+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:сизевть Nouns1 ;
складямо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:складямо Nouns3 ;
сокапильге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:сокапильг Nouns2I ;
суворчувто+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:суворчувт Nouns2U ;
судало+Adv+Spatial:судал Spatials_4cx ;
тевпинге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:тевпинг Nouns2I ;
тейтерьэйде+NCom+Anim+Cnt:тейтерьэйд Nouns2I-y ;
толгацёко+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:толгацёк Nouns2U ;
тумоумарь+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:тумоумарь Nouns1 ;
ундокс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ундокс Nouns1S ;
фильмотека+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:фильмотека Nouns3 ;
чапо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:чап Nouns2U ;
чарытеште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:чарытешт Nouns2I-y ;
Шерлов+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameM:Шерлов Nouns1 ;
штанапильге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:штанапильг Nouns2I ;
ярцамкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ярцамкс Nouns1S ;
вальмало+Adv+Spatial:вальмал Spatials_4cx ;
кавалало+Adv+Spatial:кавалал Spatials_4cx ;
мастор+Adv+Spatial:мастор Spatials_4cx ;
чинеле+Adv+Spatial:чинель Spatials_4cx ;
ало+Postp+Spatial:ал Spatials_4cx ;
вере+Adv+Spatial:верь Spatials_4cx ;
икеле+Postp+Spatial:икель Spatials_4cx ;
латало+Postp+Spatial:латал Spatials_4cx ;
пеле+Postp+Spatial:пель Spatials_4cx ;
пильгало+Postp+Spatial:пильгал Spatials_4cx ;
товоло+Deict+Pron+Spatial:товол Spatials_4cx ;
удало+Postp+Spatial:удал Spatials_4cx ;
